Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.130

Inspection and audit of premises, paraphernalia, books, records, databases, hardware, software, or electronic data storage device—Reports for the commission—Reports on suspicious activities or irregular betting activities.

(1) The premises and paraphernalia, and all the books and records, databases, hardware, software, or any other electronic data storage device of any person, association, or organization conducting gambling activities authorized under this chapter and any person, association, or organization receiving profits therefrom or having any interest therein shall be subject to inspection and audit at any reasonable time, with or without notice, upon demand, by the commission or its designee, the attorney general or his or her designee, the chief of the Washington state patrol or his or her designee or the prosecuting attorney, sheriff, or director of public safety or their designees of the county wherein located, or the chief of police or his or her designee of any city or town in which said organization is located, for the purpose of determining compliance or noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter and any rules or regulations or local ordinances adopted pursuant thereto or any federal or state law. A reasonable time for the purpose of this section shall be: (a) If the items or records to be inspected or audited are located anywhere upon a premises any portion of which is regularly open to the public or members and guests, then at any time when the premises are so open, or at which they are usually open; or (b) if the items or records to be inspected or audited are not located upon a premises set out in (a) of this subsection, then any time between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 9:00 p.m., Monday through Friday.

(2) The commission shall be provided at such reasonable intervals as the commission shall determine with a report, under oath, detailing all receipts and disbursements in connection with such gambling activities together with such other reasonable information as required in order to determine whether such activities comply with the purposes of this chapter or any local ordinances relating thereto.

(3) The commission may require the submission of reports on suspicious activities or irregular betting activities to effectively identify players, wagering information, and suspicious and illegal transactions, including the laundering of illicit funds.

[ 2020 c 127 s 4; 2011 c 336 s 303; 1981 c 139 s 10; 1975 1st ex.s. c 166 s 7; 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 13.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2020 c 127: See notes following RCW 9.46.0364.

Severability—1981 c 139: See note following RCW 9.46.070.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 166: See note following RCW 9.46.090.